Connecticut, session 2026, HB05273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the
2 provisions of any special act, municipal charter or home rule ordinance,
3 any child under the age of twelve shall wear a personal flotation device
4 while on any public dock, wharf or pier in the state. As used in this
5 section, "personal flotation device" has the same meaning as provided
6 in 33 CFR 175.13, as amended from time to time.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
KID Joint Favorable
HB5273 / File No. 15 1

HB5273 File No. 15
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $
Department of Energy and GF – Minimal Cost Up to 10,000
Environmental Protection
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill will result in a minimal cost in FY 27, of up to $10,000, to the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection. The cost is
associated with the purchase of additional personal flotation devices, to
support educational programs run by DEEP, which would be required
for all children under 12 years old, while on any public dock, wharf, or
pier in the state. Additionally, DEEP would require new signage at
public docks, wharfs and piers, to inform the public of the required
change.
The Out Years
There would be minimal outyear costs associated with the
replacement of personal flotation devices.
HB5273 / File No. 15 2

HB5273 File No. 15
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5273
AN ACT REQUIRING CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF TWELVE TO
WEAR PERSONAL FLOTATION DEVICES ON DOCKS, WHARFS
AND PIERS.